Mississippi, session 2026, SB2007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 81-1-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 81-1-81.  (1)  It shall be the duty of the commissioner to apportion the work of examining banks among the examiners in such a way that each bank, under the provisions of law, shall be examined at least once during an eighteen-month period and more often, if necessary, in the discretion of the commissioner, at irregular intervals and without prior notice.  However, neither the commissioner nor any examiner shall examine one (1) bank twice in succession unless the commissioner, for cause, so determines.  In the event the commissioner's office, because of workload or other good sufficient cause, is unable to conduct an examination of a bank as provided for in this section, the commissioner is hereby authorized to accept the examination of any state bank performed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Reserve Bank in lieu of the examination provided for in this section.  However, in no case shall the commissioner be authorized to accept any such examination of any state bank performed by either the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Reserve Bank for any two (2) consecutive eighteen-month periods. (2)  The commissioner may join an examination and/or issue a joint report of examination with the Federal Reserve Bank of any bank holding company, including any foreign-owned bank holding company, with more than One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) in assets that owns a Mississippi state-chartered bank.  The commissioner shall not perform an examination independent of the Federal Reserve Bank.  The commissioner may accept any examination report of a bank holding company performed solely by the Federal Reserve Bank in lieu of conducting a joint examination.  Further, the commissioner may join in related supervisory orders issued by the Federal Reserve Bank.  There shall be no cost to a bank or a bank holding company as a result of the commissioner's participation in a joint examination of a bank holding company as authorized by this subsection. * * *  The provisions of this subsection (2) shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.